Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 77

Arkansas Earthquake Preparedness Act of 1989

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 247, § 10: Feb. 24, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is designed to charge the Office of Emergency Services with full responsibility of administering the Earthquake Preparedness Program and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Cross References. Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq.

Earthquake activity, §15-21-601 et seq.

12-77-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Arkansas Earthquake Preparedness Act of 1989.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 247, § 1.

12-77-102. Purpose.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

There exists a history of violent seismic activity within the central United States seismic zone which includes the New Madrid Fault, the southern branch of the New Madrid Fault being at or about Marked Tree, Arkansas, and extends northeast into Missouri and Tennessee;

That a recurrence of the 1811-1812 earthquake swarm, whereby fifty-five (55) of the approximate two thousand ten (2,010) earthquakes occurring during a three-month period that had surface wave magnitudes of 6.0 — 8.7 on the Richter scale, estimated to have affected in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000) square miles, is again possible; and

That it is essential for the protection of life and limb of the citizens of this state, and particularly those approximately six hundred fifty thousand (650,000) citizens on and in close proximity of the fault, that a program be initiated to provide for continuous mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery capability for violent seismic activity.

The General Assembly further determines that it is appropriate to amend the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, § 12-76-101 et seq., to be in concert with the Central United States Earthquake Consortium efforts to develop an Interstate Earthquake Emergency Compact.

Therefore, it is the purpose and intent of this chapter to initiate a program to deal with this matter and to charge the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, Earthquake Preparedness Program, with the responsibility of carrying out the program requiring the full cooperation of all other state and local government agencies, departments, offices, and personnel and requiring that all earthquake mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery-related functions of Arkansas be coordinated to the maximum extent with comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments and agencies, with other states and localities, and with private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective earthquake mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery capabilities may be accomplished.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (b).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1), (a)(2)(E) and (b).

The 2009 amendment inserted “especially to Arkansans living near the New Madrid Fault” in (a)(2)(E), and made a related change.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 247, § 2; 1999, No. 646, § 39.

12-77-103. Arkansas earthquake program.

(1)The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, Earthquake Preparedness Program, shall coordinate an earthquake program designed to protect the lives and property of persons of this state, to the fullest possible extent, from the direct effects of seismic activity affecting Arkansas as well as from secondary effects created by such occurrence.

The program shall coordinate all activities involved in mitigation and preparedness regarding seismic events. Toward that end, the program shall include but not be limited to:

Continued assessment from proper scientific authorities of the seismic risk to the state;

Training and education of state and local government officials, employees, and citizens of Arkansas regarding preparation and protective measures that can be taken before, during, and after an earthquake;

Planning coordination, guidance, and assistance to all state and local government officials in preparation for, response to, and recovery from earthquakes;

Coordination of earthquake program activities with comparable agencies of the federal government and other states; and

Dissemination of information to the public pertaining to earthquake hazards, especially to Arkansans living near the New Madrid Fault, protective measures, seismic resistance in building construction, and appropriate actions to be taken before, during, and after an earthquake, and other matters the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall determine to be necessary or appropriate to educate, inform, and equip citizens in this state to deal with any earthquake.

In order to carry out the responsibilities provided for in this section, the program is authorized to employ such personnel as deemed necessary to the extent that funds are appropriated therefor by the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 247, § 7; 1999, No. 646, §§ 40-42; 2009, No. 711, § 1.

12-77-104. Compliance with the Arkansas Emergency Services Act.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this chapter shall be in compliance with the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq., to the extent that if this chapter or any provision of it or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held in opposition to or out of compliance with the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq., then such provisions of this chapter are invalid.

However, the invalidity of a provision or provisions of this chapter shall not affect other provisions or application of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision, provisions, or their application.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 247, § 8.

12-77-105. Purpose.

The purpose of this section and §§12-77-106 and12-77-107 is to:

Increase disaster preparedness in Arkansas; and

Increase earthquake preparedness in all areas along the New Madrid Fault that have significant earthquake risk but a low level of public awareness.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 711, § 2.

12-77-106. Duties.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall coordinate a Disaster Preparedness Program designed to protect the lives and property of Arkansas citizens in case of flooding and other disasters and create public preparedness materials that can be disseminated to the public, including without limitation:

Training and education of state and local government officials, school districts, personnel, and citizens of Arkansas regarding preparation and protective measures that can be taken before, during, and after an earthquake;

Planning coordination, guidance, and assistance to all state and local government officials in preparation for, response to, and recovery from flooding; and

Coordination of the Disaster Preparedness Program activities with comparable agencies of the federal government and other states.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 711, § 2.

12-77-107. Reports.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall present a report on disaster preparedness including a review of the New Madrid Fault.

The department shall make recommendations for improvements to the cochairs of the Legislative Council on or before November 1 each year.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 711, § 2.